Arkansas, session 2025, SB626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas's healthcare providers are at a significant
disadvantage as a result of national reimbursement methodologies and receive
some of the lowest commercial rates in the country;
(2) In Ark. Blue Cross & Blue Shield v. Freeway Surgery Ctr.,
2024 Ark. App. 540, the Arkansas Court of Appeals interpreted Arkansas law in
a manner that permits insurers to reimburse licensed ambulatory surgical
centers at rates lower than those paid to hospital-based facilities for the
*ANS427*
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
same outpatient services despite the clear legislative intent to ensure
reimbursement on an equal basis;
(3) The interpretation in Ark. Blue Cross & Blue Shield v.
Freeway Surgery Ctr., 2024 Ark. App. 540. undermines competition in the
healthcare marketplace, disincentivizes cost-efficient alternatives to
hospital-based care, and imposes financial hardships on providers operating
in nonhospital settings; and
(4) Transparency in reimbursement methodologies will promote
fairness in the healthcare marketplace and ensure that insurers comply with
existing state laws governing provider reimbursement.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Ensure fair and equitable reimbursement rates for healthcare
clinics, hospitals, medical or imaging services performed at licensed
ambulatory surgical centers, outpatient psychiatric centers, and outpatient
imaging facilities; and
(2) Require insurers to:
(A) Reimburse healthcare clinics, hospitals, medical or
imaging services performed at licensed ambulatory surgical centers,
outpatient psychiatric centers, and outpatient imaging facilities fairly and
equitably;
(B) Disclose the insurer’s reimbursement methodologies;
and
(C) Ensure minimum reimbursement rates for healthcare
clinics, hospitals, medical or imaging services performed at licensed
ambulatory surgical centers, outpatient psychiatric centers, and outpatient
imaging facilities.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 20 — Minimum Reimbursement Rates for Healthcare Services

23-99-2001. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Adjoining states" means Louisiana, Mississippi, Missouri,
Oklahoma, Tennessee, and Texas;
(2) "Ambulatory surgery center" means an entity certified by the
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
Department of Health as an ambulatory surgery center that operates for the
purpose of providing surgical services to patients;
(3)(A) "Equivalent Medicare reimbursement" means the amount,
based on prevailing reimbursement rates and methodologies, that a healthcare
provider or health system is entitled to for healthcare services.
(B)(i) "Equivalent Medicare reimbursement" includes
services that are not covered by Medicare or are set locally by Medicare
contractors.
(ii) Services under this subdivision (3) will be
priced at the healthcare provider's overall prevailing Medicare reimbursement
collection-to-charge ratio;
(4)(A) "Health benefit plan" means an individual, blanket, or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued, renewed, or
extended in this state by a healthcare insurer.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes any group plan, policy,
or contract for healthcare services issued outside this state that provides
benefits to residents of this state.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits;
(ii) A plan that provides only eye and vision
benefits;
(iii) A disability income plan;
(iv) A credit insurance plan;
(v) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(vi) Medical payments under an automobile or
homeowners’ insurance plan;
(vii) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers’ Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers’ Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(viii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(ix) An accident-only plan;
(x) A specified disease plan;
(xi) A policy, contract, certificate, or agreement
offered or issued by a healthcare insurer to provide, deliver, arrange for,
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including
pharmacy benefits, to an entity of the state under § 21-5-401 et seq;
(xii) A qualified health plan that is a health
benefit plan under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L.
No. 111-148, and purchased on the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace
created under the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, § 23-61-801 et
seq., for an individual up to four hundred percent (400%) of the federal
poverty level;
(xiii) A health benefit plan provided by a trust
established under § 14-54-104 to provide benefits, including accident and
health benefits, death benefits, dental benefits, and disability income
benefits;
(xiv) A long-term care insurance plan; or
(xv) A health benefit plan provided by an
institution of higher education;
(5) "Health system" means an organization that owns or operates
more than one (1) hospital;
(6)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity that is authorized
by this state to offer or provide health benefit plans, policies, subscriber
contracts, or any other contracts of a similar nature that indemnify or
compensate a healthcare provider for the provision of healthcare services.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" includes without limitation:
(i) An insurance company;
(ii) A health maintenance organization;
(iii) A hospital and medical service corporation;
and
(iv) An entity that provides or administers a self-
funded health benefit plan.
(C) "Healthcare insurer" does not include:
(i) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(ii) The Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq., or any successor program;
(iii) A provider-led Arkansas shared savings entity;
(iv) An entity that offers a plan providing health
benefits to state and public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.; or
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
(v) An entity that offers a plan providing health
benefits to an institution of higher education;
(7) "Healthcare provider" means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) A health system;
(C) A physician;
(D)(i) A physician extender.
(ii) A physician extender includes without
limitation:
(a) A physician assistant who is licensed in
this state;
(b) A nurse practitioner who is licensed in
this state;
(c) An advanced practice nurse who is licensed
in this state; and
(d) A certified midwife who is licensed in
this state;
(E) A licensed ambulatory surgery center; and
(F) An outpatient facility that performs healthcare
services, including without limitation primary care clinics, urgent care
centers, specialty clinics, dialysis centers, and imaging centers;
(8) "Healthcare service" means a service or good that is
provided for the purpose of or incidental to the purpose of preventing,
diagnosing, treating, alleviating curing, or healing human illness, disease,
condition, disability, or injury;
(9) “Hospital” means a healthcare facility licensed as a
hospital by the Division of Health Facilities Services under § 20-9-213;
(10) "Minimum reimbursement level" means the minimum ratio of
reimbursement to equivalent Medicare reimbursement that a healthcare provider
or health system is entitled to by a healthcare insurer for healthcare
services;
(11) "Outpatient imaging facility" means a healthcare facility
or provider that provides diagnostic and advanced imaging services to
patients and uses Current Procedural Terminology codes 70010–79999 to bill
for the facility component of imaging services;
(12) "Physician" means a person authorized or licensed to
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
practice medicine under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et
seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq.; and
(13) "Reimbursement rate" means the amount that a healthcare
provider is entitled to receive for healthcare services.

23-99-2002. Minimum reimbursement level.
(a)(1) A health benefit plan shall reimburse a healthcare provider
that provides a healthcare service the minimum reimbursement level for the
healthcare service as determined by the Insurance Commissioner.
(2) The commissioner is not required to establish a minimum
reimbursement level for each healthcare service.
(3) The minimum reimbursement level shall be established at the
healthcare provider's contract level based on the healthcare provider's
specific compliment of services.
(b) The minimum reimbursement level under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall be phased in according to the schedule below:
(1) On or after January 1, 2026, forty-five percent (45%);
(2) On or after January 1, 2027, fifty-five percent (55%);
(3) On or after January 1, 2028, sixty-five percent (65%);
(4) On or after January 1, 2029, seventy-five percent (75%); and
(5) On or after January 1, 2030, one hundred percent (100%).
(c)(1) The commissioner shall determine the minimum reimbursement
level for a healthcare service by calculating the weighted average ratio of
commercial prices as a percentage of Medicare reimbursement for the
healthcare service in adjoining states as derived from the RAND Corporation's
Prices Paid to Hospitals by Private Plans findings as adopted by rule of the
commissioner.
(2) If the RAND Corporation's Prices Paid to Hospitals by
Private Plans findings are discontinued, delayed, or deemed unsuitable by the
commissioner, the commissioner shall compute an adjusted ratio of commercial
prices as a percentage of Medicare by applying a factor of the annual change
in the Consumer Price Index: Medical Care, commonly known as the "medical
care index", published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and
adopted by rule of the commissioner to the weighted average increase of
Medicare reimbursement for a healthcare provider to the most recently
published minimum reimbursement level.
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
(d) Beginning September 1, 2025, the commissioner shall publish
annually on the State Insurance Department's website the minimum
reimbursement level as determined under subsection (c) of this section.

23-99-2003. Disclosures.
(a)(1) A healthcare insurer shall document compliance with this
subchapter for each healthcare provider.
(2) A healthcare insurer shall include documentation of
compliance required in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for each health
benefit plan offered by the healthcare insurer to a healthcare provider.
(b)(1) A healthcare insurer shall disclose to each contracted
healthcare provider summary documentation, including the supporting detailed
calculations and assumptions.
(2) The summary documentation under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall be made available to:
(A) The contracted healthcare provider before the
execution or renewal of a contract and within fifteen (15) days of a formal
request; and
(B) The Insurance Commissioner within fifteen (15) days of
a formal request.

23-99-2004. Enforcement.
(a) A dispute under this subchapter shall be filed with the Insurance
Commissioner.
(b)(1) After notice and opportunity for a hearing, if a healthcare
insurer or a health benefit plan is found to have violated this subchapter,
the commissioner may revoke or suspend the authority of the healthcare
insurer or health benefit plan to do business in this state.
(2) The commissioner shall rule on a dispute within sixty (60)
days.
(c) A healthcare insurer or health benefit plan that has violated this
subchapter shall be required to repay the healthcare provider all amounts in
violation of this subchapter plus eight percent (8%) interest and five
percent (5%) in administrative fees, inclusive of amounts otherwise due from
the patient.

04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
23-99-2005. Prohibition on pricing increases.
(a) Before a healthcare insurer’s implementation of an increase in
premium rates, cost sharing, or per-member-per-month costs or payments for
rates or insurance policies that are required to be reviewed by the Insurance
Commissioner under §§ 23-79-109 and 23-79-110, the commissioner shall
consider the following additional factors in his or her review:
(1) The extent to which the healthcare insurer’s RBC level as
defined in § 23-63-1302 is less than six hundred fifty percent (650%); and
(2)(A) To the extent permitted by federal law, whether the
healthcare insurer’s medical loss ratio is greater than eighty-five percent
(85%) on clinical services and quality improvement.
(B) The calculation of medical claims and quality
improvements for a healthcare insurer's medical loss ratio under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section should exclude:
(i) Any performance-based compensation, bonus, or
other financial incentive paid directly or indirectly to a contracting entity
employee, affiliate, contractor, or other entity or individual;
(ii) Any expense associated with carrying enrollee
medical debt; and
(iii) Cost sharing.
(b) A healthcare insurer in the fully insured group market shall
consider the factors in subsection (a) of this section before implementing an
increased premium rate, cost sharing, or enrollee per-member-per-month fee.

23-99-2006. Rules.
The Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules to implement and
enforce this subchapter.

23-99-2007. Remedies and penalties.
(a) This subchapter shall not be waived by contract.
(b) An agreement or other arrangement that violates this subchapter is
void.
(c) All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Insurance
Commissioner under the Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq., including
the award of restitution and damages, shall be made available to the
commissioner for the enforcement of this subchapter.
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
(d) A violation of this section is a deceptive act, as defined by the
Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq., and § 4-88-101 et seq. except that
the statute of limitations for private causes of action against an insurer by
a healthcare provider shall be five (5) years for a violation of this
section.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability.
If any provision of this act or application of this act to any person
or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the
invalid provision of application, and to this end, the provisions of this act
are declared severable.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Retroactivity.
This act shall apply retroactively to a reimbursement claim and
contract in effect as of the effective date of this act, including any
pending claims, disputes, or litigation concerning the reimbursement of
services provided by a ambulatory surgical center, outpatient imaging
provider, facility or center, and outpatient psychiatric center.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the absence of adequate
statutory enforcement of Arkansas Code § 23-79-115 has resulted in arbitrary
and discriminatory reimbursement practices that threaten the financial
viability of ambulatory surgical centers and outpatient psychiatric centers;
that without immediate intervention by the General Assembly to pass
legislation to clarify enforcement, discriminatory reimbursement practices
will continue to restrict patient access to cost-effective healthcare
providers causing irreparable harm to Arkansas residents; and that this act
is immediately necessary because current Arkansas law does not sufficiently
address transparency in healthcare pricing, the absence of proper enforcement
of health insurer reimbursement rate laws has allowed health insurers to
ignore the application of Arkansas Code § 23-79-115 that has been the law
since November 17, 1979, that any willing provider laws are subordinate to
the requirements of Arkansas Code § 23-79-115 and proper adherence to pay-
parity statutes ensures patient access to healthcare providers of their
04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB626
choice, and that it is immediately necessary to protect against deceptive
insurance practices that harm the delivery of healthcare and reimbursement
for healthcare services in Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Irvin























04-08-2025 19:27:35 ANS427